Hawaii statutes.
§414-123 Court-ordered meeting. (a)
The circuit court may summarily order a meeting to be held:

(1) On application of any shareholder of the
corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting
was not held within the earlier of six months after the end of the
corporation's fiscal year or fifteen months after its last annual meeting; or

(2) On application of a shareholder who signed a
demand for a special meeting valid under section 414-122, if:

(A) Notice of the special meeting was not
given within thirty days after the date the demand was delivered to the
corporation's secretary; or

(B) The special meeting was not held in
accordance with the notice.

(b) The court may fix the time and place of
the meeting or determine that the meeting shall be held solely by means of
remote communication as authorized by section 414-121(c), determine the shares
entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining
shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the
form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific
matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented
at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), and enter other
orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting. [L 2000,
c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §16]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next